Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3871
(UTC 806) Trustee's skills.

(UTC 806) A trustee who has special skills or expertise, or is named trustee in reliance upon the trustee's representation that the trustee has special skills or expertise, shall use those special skills or expertise.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 71.